Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-133
Places of public accommodation, defined.

As used in sections 20-132 to 20-143, unless the context otherwise requires, places of public accommodation shall mean all places or businesses offering or holding out to the general public goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages, and accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare, and safety of the general public and such public places providing food, shelter, recreation, and amusement including, but not limited to:

(1) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment which provides lodging to transient guests, other than an establishment located within a building which contains not more than five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually occupied by the proprietor of such establishment as his residence;

(2) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch counter, soda fountain, or other facility principally engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises, including but not limited to any such facility located on the premises of any retail establishment;

(3) Any gasoline station, including all facilities located on the premises of such station and made available to the patrons thereof;

(4) Any motion picture house, theatre, concert hall, sports arena, stadium, or other place of exhibition or entertainment;

(5) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by or on behalf of this state or any agency or subdivision thereof, or any public corporation, and any such facility supported in whole or in part by public funds; and

(6) Any establishment which is physically located within the premises of any establishment otherwise covered by this section or within the premises of which is physically located any such covered establishment and which holds itself out as serving patrons of such covered establishment.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 2.